District of Columbia statutes.
3-1209.03

Registered acupuncture therapist.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, “registered acupuncture therapist” means a person who has successfully completed a program in acupuncture therapy approved by the Advisory Committee on Acupuncture and the Board of Medicine for the specific purpose of treating drug and alcohol abuse in a clinical setting and who does not otherwise possess the credentials or qualifications for the practice of acupuncture as required by § 3-1205.04.

(b)

A person who is engaged as an acupuncture therapist in the District shall register with the Mayor, renew the registration as required by rule, and pay the required registration fee established by the Mayor.

(c)

Any person registered to practice as an acupuncture therapist shall practice under the direct collaboration of a person licensed to practice acupuncture or a physician licensed to practice acupuncture.

(d)

The Mayor, in accordance with the provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules setting forth the standards of education and experience required to qualify for registration as an acupuncture therapist.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 903
as added Mar. 20, 1992, D.C. Law 9-77, § 2, 39 DCR 669
1981 Ed., § 2-3309.3.